District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Art Gallery Tax Exemption Amendment Act of 2025”.

Sec. 2. Section 47-1002(6) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended to read
as follows:
“(6) Art gallery buildings belonging to and operated by organizations which are not
organized or operated for private gain, and are open to the public generally, and for admission to
which no charge is made on more than 2 days each week; provided that, any portion of the art
gallery building used for business operations, that does not constitute unrelated trade or business
activities, that support the cultural mission of the organization shall also be eligible for
exemption under this section;”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the

Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.